Illinois, session 104th, SB3686.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 5by adding Section 10-85 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 1305/10-85 new)7    Sec. 10-85. Fiscal Year 2027 eviction early resolution 8grants. All moneys payable from funds appropriated to the 9Department in State Fiscal Year 2027 for grants to counties 10with court-based eviction early resolution programs and 11associated legal assistance, mediation, and other services 12shall be distributed by the Department in proportion to the 13volume of eviction filings by judicial circuit and 14prioritizing support for counties that are providing at least 1550% in matching funds. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 172026.